az.aff
#
# Experimantal Hunspell affix file for Azerbaijani (az-AZ)
#
# Emin Mastizada <emin@mastizada.com>
# Azerdict <azerdict.com>
LANG az_AZ
SET UTF-8
AZN İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖöƏə-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'

# Names, plural suffixes. -lər -lar
# if last vowel is (eəiöü) -lar is appended
# if last vowel is (aıou) -lar is appended
# Examples: dəniz-lər alma-lar
SFX L0 N 6
SFX L0 0 lər [eəiöü]
SFX L0 0 lər [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L0 0 lər [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L0 0 lar [aıou]
SFX L0 0 lar [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L0 0 lar [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

SFX L1 N 6
SFX L1 0 lərə [eəiöü]
SFX L1 0 lərə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L1 0 lərə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L1 0 lara [aıou]
SFX L1 0 lara [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L1 0 lara [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

SFX L2 N 6
SFX L2 0 ləri [eəiöü]
SFX L2 0 ləri [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L2 0 ləri [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L2 0 ları [aıou]
SFX L2 0 ları [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L2 0 ları [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in -ın
SFX L3 N 6
SFX L3 0 lərin [eəiöü]
SFX L3 0 lərin [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L3 0 lərin [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L3 0 ların [aıou]
SFX L3 0 ların [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L3 0 ların [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in-i -ın-ı
SFX L4 N 6
SFX L4 0 lərini [eəiöü]
SFX L4 0 lərini [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L4 0 lərini [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L4 0 larını [aıou]
SFX L4 0 larını [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L4 0 larını [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in-ə -ın-a
SFX L5 N 6
SFX L5 0 lərinə [eəiöü]
SFX L5 0 lərinə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L5 0 lərinə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L5 0 larına [aıou]
SFX L5 0 larına [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L5 0 larına [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -i-nin -ı-nın
SFX L6 N 6
SFX L6 0 lərinin [eəiöü]
SFX L6 0 lərinin [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L6 0 lərinin [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L6 0 larının [aıou]
SFX L6 0 larının [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L6 0 larının [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in-də -ın-da
SFX L7 N 6
SFX L7 0 lərində [eəiöü]
SFX L7 0 lərində [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L7 0 lərində [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L7 0 larında [aıou]
SFX L7 0 larında [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L7 0 larında [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in-dən -ın-dan
SFX L8 N 6
SFX L8 0 lərindən [eəiöü]
SFX L8 0 lərindən [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L8 0 lərindən [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L8 0 larından [aıou]
SFX L8 0 larından [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L8 0 larından [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Combined with -in-ylə -ı-yla
SFX L9 N 6
SFX L9 0 ləriylə [eəiöü]
SFX L9 0 ləriylə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L9 0 ləriylə [eəiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX L9 0 larıyla [aıou]
SFX L9 0 larıyla [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX L9 0 larıyla [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
